New Jersey, session 221, S2212.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State  of New Jersey: 1.    a. Notwithstanding any State law or regulation to the contrary, the Department of Human Services shall establish a pilot program to provide menstrual hygiene products to eligible menstruators under the State Medicaid and New Jersey FamilyCare programs, in accordance with parameters set forth by the Commissioner of Human Services. The establishment of this pilot program shall be contingent upon federal approval of the States application for a waiver pursuant to Section 1115 of Title XIX the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C., s.1315). b.    Menstrual hygiene products shall be provided, with no cost-sharing requirement, to eligible menstruators upon confirmation of eligibility by presentation of a valid Medicaid card at any pharmacy that is an approved Medicaid provider. c.     The department, in consultation with appropriate experts in the fields of gynecology, womens health, and adolescent health, shall establish: (1)  the quantity of menstrual hygiene products to be provided each month, at no cost, to eligible menstruators; and (2)  the frequency with which such items are to be provided, at no charge, to eligible menstruators. d.    The Commissioner of Human Services shall apply for such federal waivers as are necessary to implement the provisions of this section and to continue to secure federal financial participation for State Medicaid expenditures under the federal Medicaid program. e.     As used in this section: Cost-sharing means a deductible, co-insurance or co-payment, or similar charges. Menstrual hygiene products means tampons, menstrual cups, or sanitary napkins used to collect or absorb menstrual fluids. 2.    The Commissioner of Human Services, pursuant to the Administrative Procurement Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), shall adopt such rules and regulations necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act. 3. This act shall take effect immediately, but shall remain inoperable until the Commissioner of Human Services receives approval for any necessary federal waivers, pursuant to subsection d. of section 1 of this act.